District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

4-204.02

Amount of federal payment disregarded.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 402, 29 DCR 1060
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(g), 46 DCR 905

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-204.2.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 2(g) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).

Emergency Legislation

See notes to § 4-204.01.